North Dakota statutes. TITLE 52 Social Security
CHAPTER 52-04 Contributions
52-04-08.2.
Transfers of unemployment insurance experience — Recalculation of rates — Definitions — Civil and criminal penalties.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the following applies regarding assignment of penalty tax rates and transfers and acquisitions of businesses:

If an employer transfers all or a part of its trade or business to another employer and at the time of the transfer there is substantially common ownership, management, or control of the two employers, the unemployment experience attributable to the transferred trade or business is transferred to the employer to which the business is transferred. The rates of both employers must be recalculated and made effective on the first day of the quarter in which the transfer took effect. The transfer of any of the employer’s workforce to another employer is considered a transfer of trade or business under this subsection if, as a result of the transfer, the transferring employer no longer performs the trade or business in which the transferred workforce was engaged, and the trade or business is performed by the employer to which the workforce was transferred.

If, following a transfer of experience under subdivision a, the agency determines that a substantial purpose of the transfer of trade or business was to obtain a reduced unemployment insurance tax rate, the experience ratings of the employers involved must be combined into a single account and a single unemployment insurance tax rate must be assigned to that account.

If a person, who at the time of acquisition is not an employer under this title, acquires the trade or business of an employer, the unemployment experience of the acquired business may not be transferred to that person if the agency finds that the person acquired the business solely or primarily for the purpose of obtaining a lower unemployment insurance tax rate. Instead, the person must be assigned the applicable new employer rate calculated under section 52-04-05. In determining whether the business was acquired solely or primarily for the purpose of obtaining a lower unemployment insurance tax rate, the agency shall use objective factors that may include the cost of acquiring the business, whether the person continued the business enterprise of the acquired business, how long the business enterprise was continued, and whether a substantial number of new employees were hired for performance of duties unrelated to the business activity conducted before acquisition.

If a person knowingly acts or attempts to transfer or acquire a trade or business solely or primarily for the purpose of obtaining a lower unemployment insurance tax rate or knowingly violates any other provision of this chapter related to determining the assignment of an unemployment insurance tax rate, or if a person knowingly advises another person in a way that results in a violation of those provisions, the person is subject to the civil penalties provided in this subsection.

If the person is an employer, the employer must be assigned, in lieu of that employer’s experience rate, the highest rate assignable under this chapter for the rate year during which the violation or attempted violation occurred and the three rate years immediately following that rate year. However, if the employer’s experience rate is already at the highest rate for any year of that four-year period or if the amount of increase in the person’s experience rate imposed under this subdivision would be less than two percent for any year of the four-year period, the penalty unemployment insurance tax rate for the year must be determined by adding a rate increment of two percent of taxable wages to the calculated experience rate.

If the person is not an employer, the person is subject to a civil penalty of not more than twenty-five thousand dollars. Any civil penalty collected must be deposited in the penalty and interest account established under section 52-04-22.

In addition to the civil penalty imposed under subsection 3, any person that knowingly violates this section or knowingly attempts to violate this section is guilty of a class C felony.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 456, § 6.

52-04-09.
Classification of employers to determine contributions — Regulations governing.

An employer’s rate for a calendar year must be determined on the basis of the employer’s experience with contribution payments and benefit charges as of October first of the preceding year. If, when such determination is to be made, an employer has failed to file a required report or filed an insufficient report, job service North Dakota shall notify the employer thereof by certified mail addressed to the employer’s last-known address. Unless the employer files the report or a sufficient report within fifteen days after mailing of the notice, the employer’s rate for the following calendar year must be set as follows:

Experience-rated positive employers must be assigned the negative employer minimum rate.

Experience-rated negative employers must be assigned the negative employer maximum rate.

New positive nonconstruction employers must be assigned the negative employer minimum rate.

New positive construction employers must be assigned the negative employer maximum rate.

New negative employers must be assigned the negative employer maximum rate.

If, at any time, an employer has failed to file a required report or filed an insufficient report, job service North Dakota may, at any time, estimate the wage information required by the report on the basis of reasonably available evidence. Job service North Dakota shall notify the employer of the estimate by certified mail addressed to the employer’s last-known address. Unless the employer files the report or a sufficient report within fifteen days after the mailing of the notice, the estimate becomes final for all purposes, except that if the amount of estimated wages is less than the actual wages, job service North Dakota may reconsider the estimate.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 232, § 4, subs. c, subd. 3(ii); 1941, ch. 261, § 2, subs. c, subd. 5; R.C. 1943, § 52-0409; S.L. 1945, ch. 284, § 5; 1957 Supp., § 52-0409; S.L. 1959, ch. 353, § 4; 1981, ch. 501, § 5; 1985, ch. 543, § 5; 1987, ch. 595, § 3; 1999, ch. 435, § 3; 2003, ch. 440, § 5; 2003, ch. 442, § 1.

52-04-10.
Contributions for ensuing year — Notification — Review.

The bureau shall promptly make a determination and notify each employer of the employer’s rate of contributions as determined for each ensuing year by the end of the first full week of December, but not later than December tenth, of the preceding year. The rate of contributions must be computed pursuant to the provisions of this chapter. The determination becomes conclusive and binding upon the employer unless, within fifteen calendar days after the mailing of the notice thereof to the employer’s last-known address, or in the absence of the mailing, within fifteen calendar days after the delivery of such notice, the employer files a written appeal of the determination. However, no employer shall have standing, in any proceeding involving the employer’s rate of contributions or contribution liability, to contest the chargeability to the employer’s account of any benefits paid in accordance with a determination, redetermination, or decision pursuant to the provisions of chapter 52-06, except upon the ground that the services on the basis of which such benefits were found to be chargeable did not constitute services performed in employment for the employer and only in the event that the employer was not a party to such determination, redetermination, or decision or to any other administrative proceeding in which the character of these services was determined. For purposes of this section, an employer was not a party to any such proceeding if notice of the determination, redetermination, or decision and the employer’s right to appeal the determination, redetermination, or decision was not mailed or personally delivered to the employer.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 232, § 4, subs. c, subd. 3; 1941, ch. 261, § 2, subs. c, subd. 9; R.C. 1943, § 52-0410; S.L. 1945, ch. 284, § 5; 1957 Supp., § 52-0410; S.L. 1973, ch. 391, § 13; 1981, ch. 501, § 6; 2003, ch. 440, § 6; 2005, ch. 459, § 1.

52-04-11.
Unpaid contributions to bear interest — Penalties for failure to file reports — Penalties and interest collected paid into the federal advance interest repayment fund.

Contributions unpaid when due must bear interest at the rate of one and one-half percent per month or fraction thereof from due date.

Any employer who fails to submit to the bureau any employer’s contribution and wage report by the date due shall pay the bureau a penalty equal to five percent of the contributions due for each month or part of a month until the report is submitted. The penalty for the first month of the first delinquent report in a calendar year may not be less than twenty-five dollars. The penalty for the first month of any subsequent delinquent reports in a calendar year may not be less than one hundred dollars. The penalty for subsequent months may not exceed twenty percent of contributions due. The maximum penalty imposed by this subsection may not exceed five hundred dollars for any single report. The penalty imposed by this subsection may be waived if the bureau determines that the failure to submit the report timely was caused by circumstances beyond the control of the employer.

The executive director, or any bureau employee authorized in writing by the executive director, is authorized to enter into written agreements with employers relating to their liability in respect to delinquent contributions, interest, penalties, and costs when such employers are indebted to the bureau because of failure to pay contributions required to be paid within any given period of time; provided, that such agreements must be in accordance with regulations promulgated by the bureau and filed as provided by law, and further provided that they do not contravene any other law, rule, or regulation.

The amount added under this section must be collected at the same time and in the same manner and as a part of the contributions and must be paid into the federal advance interest repayment fund.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 232, § 15, subs. a; R.C. 1943, § 52-0411; S.L. 1945, ch. 284, § 5; 1957 Supp., § 52-0411; S.L. 1959, ch. 353, § 5; 1975, ch. 458, § 1; 1983, ch. 539, § 5; 1989, ch. 594, § 5; 2009, ch. 444, § 1.

Effective Date.

The 2009 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 444, S.L. 2009 became effective August 1, 2009.

52-04-11.1.
Corporate officer personal liability.

Any officer, director, or any employee having twenty percent ownership interest of a corporation and any manager, governor, or employee having twenty percent ownership interest of a limited liability company, that is an employer under the North Dakota unemployment compensation law who has control of or supervision over the filing of and responsibility for filing contribution reports or making payment of contributions under the North Dakota unemployment compensation law, and who fails to file the reports or to make payments as required, is personally liable for contributions or reimbursement, including interest, penalties, and costs in the event the corporation or limited liability company does not pay to the bureau those amounts for which the employer is liable.

The personal liability of any person as provided herein shall survive dissolution, reorganization, bankruptcy, receivership, or assignment for the benefit of creditors. For the purposes of this section, all wages paid by the corporation or limited liability company must be considered earned from the person determined to be personally liable.

The unemployment insurance division shall make a written determination as to the personal liability of a corporate officer or employee under this section. The determination is final unless the person found to be personally liable files a written appeal of the determination within fifteen calendar days after mailing of the notice of determination to the person’s last-known address.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 604, § 1; 1993, ch. 54, § 106; 2001, ch. 453, § 3; 2005, ch. 459, § 2.

52-04-12.
Civil action to collect contributions, interest, penalties, delinquency fees — Service on nonresident employers — Contribution liens — Certificates.

Collection process of the bureau shall also be by civil action for collection of any money owing to the bureau from any source and for whatever reason, inclusive of interest thereon, penalties and delinquency fees when there is provision for such additional assessments. Costs of the action allowed by statute must be added when judgment is awarded against the debtor, unless waived. When the debtor is a nonresident of this state and the claim for relief accrued subsequent to July 1, 1963, and prior to July 1, 1969, jurisdiction thereof by service of process must be governed by the provisions of this section as it appeared in chapter 334 of the 1963 North Dakota Session Laws and the Supplement to the North Dakota Century Code from July 1, 1963, to July 1, 1969, and when the claim for relief accrued subsequent to July 1, 1969, and prior to August 1, 1971, jurisdiction thereof by service of process must be governed by the provisions of chapter 293 of the 1969 North Dakota Session Laws and chapter 28-06.1 of the Supplement to the North Dakota Century Code, and when the claim for relief accrued subsequent to August 1, 1971, jurisdiction thereof by service of process must be governed by the amended provisions of rule 4 of the North Dakota Rules of Civil Procedure adopted and promulgated by the supreme court under date of June 28, 1971.

Whenever any employer, liable to pay contributions, interest, or penalty, fails to pay, the amount of contributions, interest, penalty, and costs that accrue is a lien in favor of the state upon all property and all rights to property belonging to the employer. The lien attaches at the time the contributions, interest, or penalty becomes due, and continues until the liability is satisfied. To preserve the lien against subsequent mortgages, purchasers for value and without notice of the lien, judgment creditors, and lienholders, job service North Dakota shall file a notice of lien utilizing one of these methods:

In the central indexing system maintained by the secretary of state. Job service North Dakota shall index in the central indexing system the following data:

The name of the employer.

The name “job service North Dakota” as claimant.

The date and time the notice of lien was indexed.

The amount of the lien.

With the recorder, in the county in which the property is located, a notice of the lien. The lien is effective from the time of filing of the notice. The recorder shall preserve the notice and endorse on it the day, hour, and minute when it was received. The recorder shall index the notice of lien in an appropriate index record and record the notice of lien in the manner provided for recording real estate mortgages. The recorder shall accept the notice of lien for filing without payment of a fee by job service North Dakota. Upon payment of the contributions, interest, penalty, and costs, job service North Dakota shall file with the recorder a satisfaction of the lien. The recorder shall enter the satisfaction on the notice of lien, index the satisfaction in an appropriate index record, and record the satisfaction in the manner provided for recording satisfactions of real estate mortgages. The recorder shall accept the satisfaction for filing without payment of a fee by job service North Dakota.

Whenever any employer, liable to pay contributions, interest, or penalty, fails to pay the same, job service North Dakota may file a certificate, specifying the amount of contributions, interest, and penalty due and the name of the liable employer, with the clerk of district court in any county. The clerk shall enter and docket the certificate in the same manner as a judgment that directs the payment of money. The certificate has the force and effect of a judgment of the district court. The certificate is a lien on all the real property, except the homestead, of every person named, which the person may have in any county in which the certificate is docketed at the time of docketing or which the person thereafter acquires in the county, for ten years from the time of docketing. The certificate may be renewed in the same manner and with the same effect as a judgment that directs the payment of money. Execution of the certificate is issuable in the same manner as provided for execution of judgments. Job service North Dakota may proceed by garnishment to enforce the certificate in the same manner as a creditor is entitled to proceed by garnishment to enforce a judgment. Upon payment of the contributions, interest, penalty, and costs, job service North Dakota shall file with the clerk of court a satisfaction of the certificate. The clerk shall discharge the record in the same manner as judgments.

The foregoing remedies are cumulative and no action taken by job service North Dakota may be construed to be an election to pursue any remedy to the exclusion of any other remedy provided by law.

The notice of lien is effective as of eight a.m. following the indexing of the notice. Job service North Dakota shall index any notice of lien without payment of a fee or cost to the secretary of state. Upon payment of contributions, interest, penalty, and costs, job service North Dakota shall index a satisfaction of the lien in the central indexing system without fees or costs.

In either method, the attorney general, upon request of job service North Dakota, may bring suit without bond, to foreclose the lien.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 232, § 15, subs. b; R.C. 1943, § 52-0412; S.L. 1945, ch. 284, § 5; 1949, ch. 305, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 52-0412; S.L. 1963, ch. 334, § 1; 1973, ch. 391, §§ 19, 23; 1985, ch. 82, § 126; 1989, ch. 594, § 6; 1999, ch. 108, § 15; 2001, ch. 120, § 1; 2013, ch. 393, § 1.

Effective Date.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 393, S.L. 2013 became effective August 1, 2013.

Note.

Chapter 28-06.1, referred to in subsection 1 of this section, has been superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P. 4.

52-04-13.
Priority rights to contributions upon legal dissolutions or distributions.

In the event of any distribution of an employer’s assets pursuant to an order of any court under the laws of this state, including any receivership, assignment for the benefits of creditors, adjudicated insolvency, composition, or similar proceeding, contributions then or thereafter due must be paid in full prior to all other claims except taxes and claims for wages of not more than two hundred fifty dollars to each claimant, earned within four months of the commencement of the proceeding. In the event of an employer’s adjudication in bankruptcy, judicially confirmed extension proposal, or composition, under the Bankruptcy Reform Act of 1978 [Pub. L. 95-598; 92 Stat. 2583] contributions then or thereafter due are entitled to such priority as is provided in section 507 of that Act [11 U.S.C. 507]. In any action for the recovery of delinquent and defaulted contributions, the remedies of garnishment or attachment, or both, are available. No exemptions except absolute exemptions may be allowed against any levy under execution pursuant to judgment recovered in such action.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 232, § 15, subs. c; R.C. 1943, § 52-0413; S.L. 1945, ch. 284, § 5; 1949, ch. 303, § 2; 1957 Supp., § 52-0413; S.L. 1959, ch. 356, § 1; 1983, ch. 82, § 108.

52-04-14.
Adjustment and refund of contributions.

Not later than three years after the date on which any contributions or interest thereon was paid, if the employer that paid such contributions or interest thereon shall make application for an adjustment thereof in connection with subsequent contribution payments, or for a refund thereof because such adjustment cannot be made, and the bureau shall determine that such contributions or interest or any portion thereof was collected erroneously, the bureau shall allow such employer to make an adjustment thereof, without interest, in connection with subsequent contribution payments by the employer, or if such adjustment cannot be made, the bureau shall refund said amount, without interest, from the fund. For like cause and within the same period, an adjustment or refund may be made on the bureau’s own initiative.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 232, § 15, subs. d; R.C. 1943, § 52-0414; S.L. 1945, ch. 284, § 5; 1949, ch. 306, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 52-0414.

52-04-15.
Refund of moneys not authorized by provisions of law.

Nothing in the North Dakota unemployment compensation law may be construed to authorize any refund of moneys due and payable under the law and regulations in effect at the time such moneys were paid.

Source:

S.L. 1941, ch. 261, § 11, subs. c; R.C. 1943, § 52-0415; S.L. 1945, ch. 284, § 5; 1957 Supp., § 52-0415.

52-04-16.
Limitations on actions brought by bureau.

Actions brought under section 52-04-12 must be commenced within six years after the claim for relief has accrued; provided, however, that in the case of a false or fraudulent return, or the willful failure to file a return with intent to evade any payment, proceedings in court may be begun at any time.

Source:

S.L. 1945, ch. 284, § 5; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 52-0416; S.L. 1973, ch. 393, § 1; 1985, ch. 82, § 127.

52-04-17.
Administrative determinations of coverage.

The unemployment insurance division, upon its own motion or upon application of an employing unit, may make a written determination with respect to whether an employing unit constitutes an employer, or whether services performed for or in connection with the business of an employing unit constitute employment, or both such determinations. A determination made pursuant to this section is final unless the employing unit, within fifteen calendar days of the date of mailing of the determination, files a written appeal with job service North Dakota.

Source:

S.L. 1945, ch. 284, § 5; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 52-0417; S.L. 1983, ch. 82, § 109; 2005, ch. 459, § 3.

52-04-17.1.
Retroactive payment not required.

When the bureau reviews a potential employment relationship involving an independent contractor who has a valid identification number issued under section 34-05-01.4 and determines that the party described as an independent contractor is an employee for purposes of unemployment compensation, rather than an independent contractor, the bureau may not require the party determined to be the employer to pay contributions for that employee, or any interest, penalty, or delinquency fee with respect to those contributions, retroactive to the date the relationship with the employee began, unless, however, the bureau determines that the employer willfully and intentionally entered the relationship with the purpose of avoiding unemployment compensation benefits. The bureau may require the payment of contributions for that employee as of the date the order declaring an employment relationship becomes final.

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 347, § 3.

52-04-18.
Financing benefits paid to employees of nonprofit organizations.

Benefits paid to employees of nonprofit organizations must be financed in accordance with the provisions of this section. For the purpose of this section, a nonprofit organization is an organization, or group of organizations, described in section 501(c)(3) of the United States Internal Revenue Code which is exempt from income tax under section 501(a) of such code.

Liability for contributions and election of reimbursement. Any nonprofit organization which, pursuant to subdivision i of subsection 15 of section 52-01-01, is, or becomes, subject to the North Dakota unemployment compensation law on or after January 1, 1972, shall pay contributions under the provisions of this chapter, unless it elects, in accordance with this subsection, to pay to the bureau for the unemployment fund an amount equal to the amount of regular benefits and of one-half of the extended benefits paid, that is attributable to service in the employ of such nonprofit organization, to individuals for weeks of unemployment which begin during the effective period of such election.

Any nonprofit organization which is, or becomes, subject to the North Dakota unemployment compensation law on January 1, 1972, may elect to become liable for payments in lieu of contributions for a period of not less than one taxable year beginning with January 1, 1972, provided it files with the bureau a written notice of its election within the thirty-day period immediately following such date or within a like period immediately following the date of enactment of this subdivision, whichever occurs later.

Any nonprofit organization which becomes subject to the North Dakota unemployment compensation law after January 1, 1972, may elect to become liable for payments in lieu of contributions for a period of not less than twelve months beginning with the date on which such subjectivity begins by filing a written notice of its election with the bureau not later than thirty days immediately following the date of the determination of such subjectivity.

Any nonprofit organization which makes an election in accordance with subdivision a or subdivision b will continue to be liable for payments in lieu of contributions until it files with the bureau a written notice terminating its election not later than thirty days prior to the beginning of the taxable year for which such termination shall first be effective, and it shall thereafter be treated as a new or newly covered employer for the purpose of rate computation.

Any nonprofit organization which has been paying contributions under the North Dakota unemployment compensation law for a period subsequent to January 1, 1972, may change to a reimbursable basis by filing with the bureau not later than thirty days prior to the beginning of any taxable year a written notice of election to become liable for payments in lieu of contributions. Such election is not terminable by the organization for that and the next year.

The bureau may for good cause extend the period within which a notice of election, or a notice of termination, must be filed and may permit an election to be retroactive but not any earlier than with respect to benefits paid after December 31, 1969.

The bureau, in accordance with such regulations as it may prescribe, shall notify each nonprofit organization of any determination which it may make of its status as an employer and of the effective date of any election which it makes and of any termination of such election. Such determinations are subject to reconsideration, appeal, and review in accordance with administrative regulations of the bureau established for appeals from determinations on claims for benefits and thereafter the decision of the bureau is subject to judicial review as provided for in chapter 52-06.

Reimbursement payments. Payments in lieu of contributions must be made in accordance with the provisions of this subsection including either subdivision a or b.

At the end of each calendar quarter, or at the end of any other period as determined by the bureau, the bureau shall bill each nonprofit organization, or group of such organizations, which has elected to make payments in lieu of contributions for an amount equal to the full amount of regular benefits plus one-half of the amount of extended benefits paid during such quarter or other prescribed period that is attributable to service in the employ of such organization.

An alternative method for reimbursement payments may be as follows:

Each nonprofit organization that has elected payments in lieu of contributions may request permission to make such payments as hereinafter provided. Such method of payment becomes effective upon approval by the bureau.

At the end of each calendar quarter, the bureau shall bill each nonprofit organization for an amount representing one of the following:

For 1972, two-tenths of one percent of its total payroll for 1971.

For years after 1972, such percentage of its total payroll for the immediately preceding calendar year as the bureau shall determine. Such determination must be based each year on the average benefit costs attributable to service in the employ of nonprofit organizations during the preceding calendar year.

For any organization which did not pay wages throughout the four calendar quarters of the preceding calendar year, such percentage of its payroll during such year as the bureau shall determine.

At the end of each taxable year, the bureau may modify the quarterly percentage of payroll thereafter payable by the nonprofit organization in order to minimize excess or insufficient payments.

At the end of each taxable year, the bureau shall determine whether the total of payments for such year made by a nonprofit organization is less than, or in excess of, the total amount of regular benefits plus one-half of the amount of extended benefits paid to individuals during such taxable year based on wages attributable to service in the employ of such organization. Each nonprofit organization whose total payments for such year are less than the amount so determined is liable for payment of the unpaid balance to the fund in accordance with subdivision c. If the total payments exceed the amount so determined for the taxable year, all or a part of the excess may, at the discretion of the bureau, be refunded from the fund or retained in the fund as part of the payments which may be required for the next taxable year.

Payment of any bill rendered under subdivision a or b must be made not later than thirty days after such bill was mailed to the last-known address of the nonprofit organization or was otherwise delivered to it, unless there has been an application for review in accordance with subdivision e.

Payments made by any nonprofit organization under the provisions of this subsection shall not be deducted or deductible, in whole or in part, from the remuneration of individuals in the employ of the organization.

The amount due specified in any bill from the bureau is conclusive on the organization unless, not later than fifteen days after the bill was mailed to the last-known address or otherwise delivered to it, the organization files an appeal with the bureau setting forth the grounds for such appeal. Proceedings on appeal to the bureau from the amount of a bill rendered under this subsection must be in accordance with administrative regulations of the bureau and thereafter the decision of the bureau is subject to judicial review as provided for in chapter 52-06.

Past-due payments of amounts in lieu of contributions are subject to the same interest, delinquency fee, and penalties that, pursuant to this chapter apply to past-due contributions.

Authority to terminate elections. If any nonprofit organization is delinquent in making payments in lieu of contributions as required under subsection 2, the bureau may terminate such organization’s election to make payments in lieu of contributions as of the beginning of the next taxable year, and such termination is effective for that and the next taxable year.

Allocation of benefit costs. Each employer that is liable for payments in lieu of contributions shall pay to the bureau for the fund the amount of regular benefits plus the amount of one-half of extended benefits paid that are attributable to service in the employ of such employer. If benefits paid to an individual are based on wages paid by more than one employer and one or more of such employers are liable for payments in lieu of contributions, the amount payable to the fund by each employer that is liable for such payments must be determined in accordance with the provisions of subdivision a or b.

Proportionate allocation, when fewer than all base-period employers are liable for reimbursement. If benefits paid to an individual are based on wages paid by one or more employers that are liable for payments in lieu of contributions and on wages paid by one or more employers who are liable for contributions, the amount of benefits payable by each employer that is liable for payments in lieu of contributions must be an amount which bears the same ratio to the total benefits paid to the individual as the total base-period wages paid to the individual by such employer bear to the total base-period wages paid to the individual by all of the individual’s base-period employers.

Proportionate allocation, when all base-period employers are liable for reimbursement. If benefits paid to an individual are based on wages paid by two or more employers that are liable for payments in lieu of contributions, the amount of benefits payable by each such employer must be an amount which bears the same ratio to the total benefits paid to the individual as the total base-period wages paid to the individual by such employer bear to the total base-period wages paid to the individual by all of the individual’s base-period employers.

Notwithstanding any provisions in this section, any nonprofit organization that prior to January 1, 1969, paid contributions required by this chapter, and elects, within thirty days after July 1, 1971, to make payments in lieu of contributions, may not be required to make any such payment on account of any regular or extended benefits paid, on the basis of wages paid by such organization to individuals for weeks of unemployment which begin on or after the effective date of such election until the total amount of such benefits equals the amount of the positive balance in the experience rating account of such organization.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 475, § 5; 1973, ch. 391, § 20.

Note.

For above referenced section 501 of the Internal Revenue Code, see 26 USCS § 501.

52-04-19.
Financing benefits paid to employees of the state hospitals or state institutions of higher education.

Benefits paid to employees based on service attributable to employment in state hospitals or of state institutions of higher education must be financed in accordance with the provisions of this section. For the purpose of this section and subdivision h of subsection 15 of section 52-01-01, an institution of higher education means an educational institution defined in subsection 27 of section 52-01-01, and a state hospital means an institution defined in subsection 25 of section 52-01-01. An employing unit which, pursuant to subdivision h of subsection 15 of section 52-01-01, is, or becomes, subject to the North Dakota unemployment compensation law on or after January 1, 1972, shall pay contributions under the provisions of this chapter, unless it elects as hereafter provided to pay to the bureau for the unemployment fund an amount equal to the amount of regular benefits and the extended benefits paid, that is attributable to service in the employ of such state hospital or such state institution of higher education, to individuals for weeks of unemployment which begin during the effective period of such election. Payments in lieu of contributions must be made at the end of each calendar quarter or at the end of any other period determined by the bureau. Election and changes in the method of financing must be in the same manner provided for in section 52-04-18.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 475, § 6; 1973, ch. 391, § 21; 1977, ch. 467, § 1.

52-04-19.1.
Financing benefits paid to employees of the state of North Dakota and governmental entities within the state of North Dakota.

Benefits paid to employees of the state of North Dakota, its departments and instrumentalities, or any instrumentality of more than one of the foregoing, or an instrumentality of the foregoing and one or more other states, which are attributable to employment by an employing unit which, after December 31, 1977, is defined as an employer, must be financed by one of the following methods:

By payment of contributions as provided under section 52-04-06, plus one-half the cost of the extended benefits paid that are attributable to wages paid by an employer.

By payment in lieu of contributions each quarter for the calendar years 1978 and 1979 in an amount equal to one percent of their total quarterly payroll, and the rate of contributions to be paid for each two-year period after 1979 must be as determined by the bureau each January by computing the cost of benefits paid under chapters 52-06 and 52-07.1 which are attributable to wages paid by employers, and the bureau may modify such rate in order to minimize excess or insufficient payments in any prior periods.

In lieu of contributions an employer may elect to pay to the bureau for the unemployment fund an amount equal to the amount of benefits paid under chapters 52-06 and 52-07.1 which are attributable to wages paid in the employ of such governmental employer, to individuals for weeks of unemployment.

Benefits paid to employees of political subdivisions, other than state government, its departments and instrumentalities, or any instrumentality of more than one of the foregoing which are attributable to employment by an employing unit which, after December 31, 1977, is defined as an employer, must be financed by one of the following methods:

By payment of contributions as provided under section 52-04-06 plus one-half the cost of the extended benefits paid that are attributable to wages paid by an employer.

By payment in lieu of contributions each quarter for the calendar year 1978 in an amount equal to one percent of their total quarterly payroll, and the rate of contribution to be paid quarterly each year after 1978 must be determined by the bureau each January by computing the cost of benefits paid under chapters 52-06 and 52-07.1 which are attributable to wages paid by employers, and the bureau may modify such rate in order to minimize excess or insufficient payments in any prior periods.

In lieu of contributions an employer may elect to pay to the bureau for the unemployment fund an amount equal to the amount of benefits paid under chapters 52-06 and 52-07.1 which are attributable to wages paid in the employ of such governmental employer, to individuals for weeks of unemployment.

Employers under this section shall notify the bureau of the plan selected for financing benefits within sixty days of becoming an employer. In the event of an unexcused failure of an employer to notify the bureau of the plan selected for financing benefits, the bureau shall assess that employer the rate of contributions provided for in section 52-04-06 plus one-half the cost of the extended benefits paid that are attributable to wages paid by that employer.

Elections and changes in the method of financing provided for in section 52-04-18 are applicable to employers under this section.

Any two or more employers under this section may file a joint application for the establishment of a group for the purpose of wage reporting and financing as regulations may prescribe.

Past-due payments under this section are subject to the same interest and penalties that apply to past-due contributions in section 52-04-11.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 459, § 12; 1981, ch. 501, § 7.

Cross-References.

Unemployment compensation assessments to departments and institutions, see § 54-44-04.2.